District of Columbia statutes.
22-1105

Repealed

Weekly payments by Superintendent of Workhouse for each day’s confinement

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 586, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 165(a), (b)
1981 Ed., §§ 22-903 to 22-906.